transducers/Even/eve.lexd
PATTERN NounStem
PHDBase [<phd>:]
PtcBase [<ptc>:]
NounBase [<n>:]
(VerbBase [<v>:] VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv?)|AdjBase [<adj>:]|NumBase [<num>:]|(NounBase [<n>:] NounDeriv? NounDeriv? Verbalizer) Nominalizer

PATTERN VerbStem
Neg.Aux [<v>:]
VerbBase [<v>:]
(NounBase [<n>:] NounDeriv? NounDeriv?)|AdjBase [<adj>:]|NumBase [<num>:]|(VerbBase VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv? Nominalizer) Verbalizer
PHDBase [<phd>:]

PATTERN AdjStem
AdjBase [<adj>:]
(NounBase [<n>:] NounDeriv? NounDeriv?)|NumBase [<num>:]|(VerbBase [<v>:] > VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv?) Adjalizer

PATTERN AdvStem
CvbBase [<cvb>:]
AdvBase [<adv>:]
AdjStem AdvDeriv

PATTERN VerbTencePNum # для 4A прописать отдельно, добавить про desid
Verbpst VerbPNumpst
Verbnfut VerbPNumnfut
Verbfut VerbPNumfut
Verbpurp VerbPNumpurp
VerbMood VerbPNumMood
Verbhyp VerbPNumpst
VerbCvb_agreement VerbPNumpst

PATTERNS
NounStem NounDeriv? NounDeriv? Dim_Aug? Dim_Aug? NounAlPoss? NounNumber? NounCase? NounPoss?
NounStem NounDeriv? NounDeriv? NounAlPoss? NounNumber? NounPossPred?
AdjStem NounNumber? NounCase?
VerbStem VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv? VerbAspect? VerbAspect? VerbAspect? Verbdesid? VerbTencePNum|VerbImp|Verbassume|VerbCvb
VerbStem VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv? VerbDeriv? VerbAspect? VerbAspect? VerbAspect? Verbdesid? VerbPtc > NounNumber? > NounCase? > NounPoss?
NumBase [<num>:] NumDeriv
AdvStem
PronBase_12p [<pron>:]
PronBase_3p [<pron>:] NounNumber? PronPoss
PronBaseOBL_12p [<pron>:] NounCase?
PronBaseOBL_3p [<pron>:] NounNumber? NounCase? PronPoss
QPronBase [<qpron>:] > QPronInd?
ReflBase [<refl>:] NounNumber? > NounCase? > NounPoss?
ReflBase [<refl>:] NounNumber? > Rec NounPoss
IntjBase [<intj>:]
DetBase [<det>:]
PronBase [<pron>:]
FuncBase [<func>:]
